Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5958.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 335b. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2), an individual who defecates in a public place, other than within a sanitary facility, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 60 days, a fine of not more $250.00, or both. (2) An individual who violates this section while present at or near a gathering of 10 or more individuals is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days, a fine of not more than $500.00, or both. (3) As used in this section, "public place" means a public street, sidewalk, or park or any area open to the general public in a publicly owned or operated building or public place of business. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law.